Wisconsin, session 2025, SB281.
do enact as follows:SB281,13Section 1. 462.02 (2) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB281,2,21462.02 (2) (g) An advanced practice nurse prescriber certified under s. 441.16 2(2).SB281,2,33(end) Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb281 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb281 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB281 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB281 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB281: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting